Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Fem-backVowel.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL 

LEXICON Root
NounFemBackVowelStem;

LEXICON NounFemBackVowel

+N+RT: #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM:ව #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC:ව #;
+N+RT+SG+VOC:ව #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+CJ:වත්  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+CJ:වත්  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+FN:වයි  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+FN:වයි  #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM:වක් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+FN:වකි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+CJ:වකුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM:වෝ  #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+CJ:වෝත්  #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+FN:වෝයි  #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:වක #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:වකත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:වකයි #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC:වන්  #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+CJ:වනුත්  #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+FN:වනුයි  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT:වට #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+CJ:වටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+FN:වටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:වකට #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:වකටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:වකටයි #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT:වන්ට #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+CJ:වන්ටත් #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+FN:වන්ටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL:වගෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+CJ:වගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+FN:වගෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:වකගෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:වකගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:වකගෙනි #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL:වන්ගෙන් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+CJ:වන්ගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+FN:වන්ගෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:වගේ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:වගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:වගේයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:වගෙ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:වගෙත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:වගෙයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:වකගේ #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:වකගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:වකගේයි #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN: වන්ගේ #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+CJ:වන්ගේත් #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+FN:වන්ගේයි #;
+N+RT+PL+VOC:වනි #;

LEXICON NounFemBackVowelStem   
අභිසාරිකා NounFemBackVowel;
ඒකභාර්යා NounFemBackVowel;
ගුරුමාතා NounFemBackVowel;
දේවතා NounFemBackVowel;
පරිවර්තිකා NounFemBackVowel;
භාර්යා NounFemBackVowel;
ලේඛිකා NounFemBackVowel;
ශිෂ්‍යා NounFemBackVowel;
ඊර්ෂ්‍යා	NounFemBackVowel;
ලජ්ජා	NounFemBackVowel;
සබරගමු	NounFemBackVowel;
අප්‍රිකා	NounFemBackVowel;
කෝටු	NounFemBackVowel;
සංහිඳියා	NounFemBackVowel;
අවසථා	NounFemBackVowel;
ඒකාග්‍රතා	NounFemBackVowel;
කිහිලිකරු	NounFemBackVowel;
දොයිතු	NounFemBackVowel;
ප්‍රඡා	NounFemBackVowel;
යථා	NounFemBackVowel;
විරැකියා	NounFemBackVowel;
හෙප්පු	NounFemBackVowel;
අවනඩු	NounFemBackVowel;
ආශි‍්‍රත	NounFemBackVowel;
උදවු	NounFemBackVowel;
කතාමාලා	NounFemBackVowel;
කෙන්යා	NounFemBackVowel;
ජැමෙයිකා	NounFemBackVowel;
දෙව්දු	NounFemBackVowel;
පාර්ලිිමේන්තු	NounFemBackVowel;
ප‍්‍රඥා	NounFemBackVowel;
බර්මියුඩා	NounFemBackVowel;
භෂා	NounFemBackVowel;
මොන්ගෝලියා	NounFemBackVowel;
ලාංකා	NounFemBackVowel;
විෂයමාලා	NounFemBackVowel;
සංහිඳීයා	NounFemBackVowel;
සීරු	NounFemBackVowel;
ස්ටුඩියෝ	NounFemBackVowel;
අක්‍රමික	NounFemBackVowel;
අධිෂ්ඨානශීලි	NounFemBackVowel;
අනුශුරතා	NounFemBackVowel;
අවශ්ථා	NounFemBackVowel;
ආරක‍ෂා	NounFemBackVowel;
ඉන්දියා‍	NounFemBackVowel;
එරිත්‍රියා	NounFemBackVowel;
ඕස්ෙට්‍රිලියා	NounFemBackVowel;
කල්මිකියා	NounFemBackVowel;
කුලප්පු	NounFemBackVowel;
ක්රීඩා	NounFemBackVowel;
ගුණසමරු	NounFemBackVowel;
චන්‍ද්‍රිකා	NounFemBackVowel;
තාරකාවිද්‍යා	NounFemBackVowel;
දැනුවත්	NounFemBackVowel;
ධම්මානුපස්සනා	NounFemBackVowel;
නැමීබියා	NounFemBackVowel;
නිර්ලෝභී	NounFemBackVowel;
නොහැකිවු	NounFemBackVowel;
පහසුතා	NounFemBackVowel;
පිිළිබඳ	NounFemBackVowel;
පෙරදැරි	NounFemBackVowel;
ප‍්‍රශංසා	NounFemBackVowel;
බැබිලෝනියා	NounFemBackVowel;
භාසා	NounFemBackVowel;
මහමෙව්නා	NounFemBackVowel;
මිලීෂීයා	NounFemBackVowel;
මෙසපොටේමියා	NounFemBackVowel;
යුදහමුදා	NounFemBackVowel;
රෙකමදාරු	NounFemBackVowel;
වට්ටොරු	NounFemBackVowel;
විරුද්ධතා	NounFemBackVowel;
වොල්ටීයතා	NounFemBackVowel;
සංස්්ථා	NounFemBackVowel;
සමශූරතා	NounFemBackVowel;
සැම්බියා	NounFemBackVowel;
සූත්‍රිකා	NounFemBackVowel;
හිත්වේදනා	NounFemBackVowel;
හොරණෑ	NounFemBackVowel;
අඛන්ඩ	NounFemBackVowel;
අඩපන	NounFemBackVowel;
අතිධාවනකාරී	NounFemBackVowel;
අදියුරු	NounFemBackVowel;
අධිමනෝවිද්‍යා	NounFemBackVowel;
අනාබාධිත	NounFemBackVowel;
අනුප්‍රාප්ත	NounFemBackVowel;
අනුශාංගික	NounFemBackVowel;
අපද්‍ර	NounFemBackVowel;
අපහාසාත්මක	NounFemBackVowel;
අප්‍රසිද්ධ	NounFemBackVowel;
අභිප්‍රේරිත	NounFemBackVowel;
අරක්ෂා	NounFemBackVowel;
අර්හත්	NounFemBackVowel;
අවබෝධාත්මක	NounFemBackVowel;
අවස්ථානුකූල	NounFemBackVowel;
අවිහිංසාවාදී	NounFemBackVowel;
අසමතුලිත	NounFemBackVowel;
අසිරුතා	NounFemBackVowel;
අහිංසාවාදී	NounFemBackVowel;
ආකර්ෂණිය	NounFemBackVowel;
ආඥාාපතිවරයා	NounFemBackVowel;
ආධ්‍යත්මික	NounFemBackVowel;
ආරක්ශා	NounFemBackVowel;
ආරාමගත	NounFemBackVowel;
ආවර්ථීය	NounFemBackVowel;
ආශ්රිත	NounFemBackVowel;
ඇතුඵ	NounFemBackVowel;
ඇල්බිඩෝ	NounFemBackVowel;
ඉකුත්	NounFemBackVowel;
ඉදිකරවූ	NounFemBackVowel;
ඉන්දියාණු	NounFemBackVowel;
ඉවසිලිමත්	NounFemBackVowel;
ඉස්මායිල්	NounFemBackVowel;
උඩගු	NounFemBackVowel;
උත්ප්‍රාසාත්මක	NounFemBackVowel;
උද්යෝගිමත්	NounFemBackVowel;
උපද්ර	NounFemBackVowel;
උපායමාර්ගික	NounFemBackVowel;
ඌර්ණ	NounFemBackVowel;
එක්රොක්	NounFemBackVowel;
එල්නිනෝ	NounFemBackVowel;
ඒකපාර්ශික	NounFemBackVowel;
ඒකාබද්්ධ	NounFemBackVowel;
ඔපමට්ටම්	NounFemBackVowel;
ඕස්ටේ‍්‍රල‍්‍රියා	NounFemBackVowel;
කටුබුලු	NounFemBackVowel;
කථිකාචාර්යවරයෙකු	NounFemBackVowel;
කබානා	NounFemBackVowel;
කරුණාබර	NounFemBackVowel;
කවදාක	NounFemBackVowel;
කාව්‍යාත්මක	NounFemBackVowel;
කැරෝලිනා	NounFemBackVowel;
කෑදර	NounFemBackVowel;
කුමන්ත්‍රණකාරි	NounFemBackVowel;
කෘතඥපූර්වක	NounFemBackVowel;
කෙලිලොල්	NounFemBackVowel;
කොංගෝ	NounFemBackVowel;
කොස්ටාරිකා	NounFemBackVowel;
කෝපාවිෂ්ඨ	NounFemBackVowel;
ක්‍රයි	NounFemBackVowel;
ක්‍රියාතමක	NounFemBackVowel;
ක්‍රිස්ටෝපර්	NounFemBackVowel;
ක්‍රෝඒෂියා	NounFemBackVowel;
ගතමනා	NounFemBackVowel;
ගර්භනී	NounFemBackVowel;
ගැබ්බර	NounFemBackVowel;
ගෘහස්ත	NounFemBackVowel;
ගොනෝරියා	NounFemBackVowel;
ගෝසා	NounFemBackVowel;
ඝටිකා	NounFemBackVowel;
චන්දිකා	NounFemBackVowel;
චාලක	NounFemBackVowel;
චෙච්නියා	NounFemBackVowel;
ජංගියක්	NounFemBackVowel;
ජනහද	NounFemBackVowel;
ජයරු	NounFemBackVowel;
ජාලාකාර	NounFemBackVowel;
ජීවක්‍රියා	NounFemBackVowel;
ටැස්මේනියා	NounFemBackVowel;
ඩෙල්මා	NounFemBackVowel;
තදෙවුස්	NounFemBackVowel;
තර්ජනාත්මක	NounFemBackVowel;
තාපදීප්ත	NounFemBackVowel;
තැලුවේ	NounFemBackVowel;
තුන්තරා	NounFemBackVowel;
තුෂ්නිම්භූත	NounFemBackVowel;
තේජාන්විත	NounFemBackVowel;
ත්‍යාගවන්ත	NounFemBackVowel;
දක්වාන	NounFemBackVowel;
දර්ශීය	NounFemBackVowel;
දිගුකාලීන	NounFemBackVowel;
දිලාන්	NounFemBackVowel;
දීඝකාලීන	NounFemBackVowel;
දුවද්දි	NounFemBackVowel;
දෙගල්දොරු	NounFemBackVowel;
දෙපාර්තෙම්න්තු	NounFemBackVowel;
දෙවේලක්	NounFemBackVowel;
ද්‍රවශීලතා	NounFemBackVowel;
ද්වීතික	NounFemBackVowel;
ධහරා	NounFemBackVowel;
ධ්වනිතාර්ථ	NounFemBackVowel;
නම්‍යශිලි	NounFemBackVowel;
නව්කා	NounFemBackVowel;
නැම්බියා	NounFemBackVowel;
නිතිවිරෝධි	NounFemBackVowel;
නිදිබර	NounFemBackVowel;
නිබය	NounFemBackVowel;
නියුට්‍රීනෝ	NounFemBackVowel;
නිරුද්ධ	NounFemBackVowel;
නිර්ලජ්ජිත	NounFemBackVowel;
නිශ්චිතතා	NounFemBackVowel;
නිසොල්මන්	NounFemBackVowel;
නීත්‍යනුකූල	NounFemBackVowel;
නෙගතා	NounFemBackVowel;
නොඑසේ	NounFemBackVowel;
නොබිය	NounFemBackVowel;
න්‍යායානුකූල	NounFemBackVowel;
පඨමාලා	NounFemBackVowel;
පන්තේරු	NounFemBackVowel;
පරික්ෂාකාරී	NounFemBackVowel;
පරීක්ෂාකාරී	NounFemBackVowel;
පසමිතුරු	NounFemBackVowel;
පළවු	NounFemBackVowel;
පාපන්දුසූරතා	NounFemBackVowel;
පාර්ශ්වික	NounFemBackVowel;
පැයේදී	NounFemBackVowel;
පැළපැදියම්	NounFemBackVowel;
පිළළිබඳ	NounFemBackVowel;
පීනිෂියා	NounFemBackVowel;
පූර්ණකාලීන	NounFemBackVowel;
පොරොත්තු	NounFemBackVowel;
ප්රතික්රියා	NounFemBackVowel;
ප්රනසිද්ධ	NounFemBackVowel;
ප්‍රවේශම්කාරි	NounFemBackVowel;
ප්රායෝගික	NounFemBackVowel;
බක්ට්‍රියා	NounFemBackVowel;
බලාපොරාත්තු	NounFemBackVowel;
බැහර	NounFemBackVowel;
බුදුමුත්තා	NounFemBackVowel;
බෝධිගයා	NounFemBackVowel;
භූකම්පා	NounFemBackVowel;
මන්තීරු	NounFemBackVowel;
මහලොකු	NounFemBackVowel;
මානේරු	NounFemBackVowel;
මිත්‍රයින්	NounFemBackVowel;
මුහුදුබඩපත්තු	NounFemBackVowel;
යටත්වූ	NounFemBackVowel;
යාවත්කාලින	NounFemBackVowel;
යුරේසියා	NounFemBackVowel;
රැවන්ඩා	NounFemBackVowel;
රොමෙනියා	NounFemBackVowel;
ලැටිවියා	NounFemBackVowel;
ලොල්	NounFemBackVowel;
වර්ගවාදි	NounFemBackVowel;
වාසිසහගත	NounFemBackVowel;
වික්‍රියා	NounFemBackVowel;
විදෙස්ගත	NounFemBackVowel;
විනයානුකුල	NounFemBackVowel;
වි‍රුද්ධ	NounFemBackVowel;
විශමතා	NounFemBackVowel;
වුණමනා	NounFemBackVowel;
ව්‍යවස්‌ථා	NounFemBackVowel;
ශබ්දානු	NounFemBackVowel;
ශුන්‍යතා	NounFemBackVowel;
සංඛේතාත්මක	NounFemBackVowel;
සංශෝධනයෙන්ජනතා	NounFemBackVowel;
සතූ	NounFemBackVowel;
සප්තම	NounFemBackVowel;
සමානුපාතික	NounFemBackVowel;
සම්ප්‍රයුක්ත	NounFemBackVowel;
සවිඥානක	NounFemBackVowel;
සාකජ්ජා	NounFemBackVowel;
සාමාකාමී	NounFemBackVowel;
සැඟ	NounFemBackVowel;
සින්ගප්පූරු	NounFemBackVowel;
සීසෝ	NounFemBackVowel;
සුමනාරාමාධිපති	NounFemBackVowel;
සූප්පු	NounFemBackVowel;
සොභා	NounFemBackVowel;
ස්ථාර	NounFemBackVowel;
ස්වයංක්‍රීයතා	NounFemBackVowel;
හල්බරා	NounFemBackVowel;
හුලන්දා	NounFemBackVowel;
ළයාන්විත	NounFemBackVowel;
අනන්‍යතා	NounFemBackVowel;
ජයග්‍රාහිකා	NounFemBackVowel;
නිරූපිකා	NounFemBackVowel;
ලියූ	NounFemBackVowel;
කොළොම්බියා	NounFemBackVowel;
පාරම්පරික	NounFemBackVowel;
වයස්කරු	NounFemBackVowel;
කෙටිකතා	NounFemBackVowel;
බුකීකරු	NounFemBackVowel;
ඩයස්පෝරා	NounFemBackVowel;
උදව්	NounFemBackVowel;
ප්‍රෝකැරියෝටා	NounFemBackVowel;
සමත්වූ	NounFemBackVowel;
දුර්වලතා	NounFemBackVowel;
තමිල්නාඩු	NounFemBackVowel;
න්‍යායාත්මක	NounFemBackVowel;
ආපදා	NounFemBackVowel;
පෙරහුරු	NounFemBackVowel;
ව්‍යවස්ථා	NounFemBackVowel;
අමාරු	NounFemBackVowel;
නාළිකා	NounFemBackVowel;
ගේට්ටුකරු	NounFemBackVowel;
ප්‍රවනතා	NounFemBackVowel;
ආපනශාලා	NounFemBackVowel;
ඉරියවු	NounFemBackVowel;
බලකණු	NounFemBackVowel;
රේඛා	NounFemBackVowel;
වේදිකා	NounFemBackVowel;
තරු	NounFemBackVowel;
වංශකථා	NounFemBackVowel;
ස්වාධීන	NounFemBackVowel;
ඔප්පු	NounFemBackVowel;
හූ	NounFemBackVowel;
කේන්ද්‍රගත	NounFemBackVowel;
සත්	NounFemBackVowel;
